Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.860

Suspension of retirement allowance upon reemployment or if covered by a plan under RCW 28B.10.400—Reinstatement.

(1) Except under RCW 41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.37.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.

(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused the suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 13; 2005 c 327 s 2; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 9; 1997 c 254 s 7; 1995 c 239 s 110.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 41.40.037.

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.